bg-BG: Ниво на блясък/гланц: Пълен мат; Дълбок мат; Притъпен мат; Яйчена черупка; Екстра-мат; Плосък мат; Гланц; Чук; Силен гланц; Мат; Метален гланц; Огледало; Сатен; Сатенен гланц; Полугланц; Полумат; Полусатен; Коприна; Копринен гланц; Копринен мат; Гладък; Мек гланц; Мек блясък; Други
nb: Glansnivå: Død matt; Dyp matt; Matt; Eggeskall; Ekstra matt; Flat matt; Gloss; Hammer; Høyglans; Matt; Metallisk glans; Speil; Sateng; Satengglans; Halvblank; Halvmatt; Halvsateng; Silke; Silkeglans; Silkematte; Glatt; Myk glans; Myk blankhet; Annet
el: Επίπεδο στιλπνότητας/γυαλάδας: Νεκρό-ματ; Deep-matte; Θαμπό-ματ; Κέλυφος αυγού; Έξτρα ματ; Επίπεδο-ματ; Λάμψη; Σφυρί; Έντονη λάμψη; Ματ; Μεταλλική γυαλάδα; Καθρέφτης; Σατέν; Σατέν-γυαλιστερό; Ημι-γυαλιστερό; Ημι-ματ; Ημισατινέ; Μετάξι; Silk-gloss; Μεταξωτό-ματ; Ήπια; Απαλή γυαλάδα; Απαλή λάμψη; Άλλο
vi: Độ sáng/độ bóng: Lì-mờ; Sâu-mờ; Đục-mờ; Vỏ trứng; Siêu-mờ; Phẳng-mờ; Bóng; Búa; Độ bóng cao; Lì; Bóng ánh kim; Gương; Satin; Satin bóng; Nửa bóng; Nửa lì; Nửa satin; Lụa; Lụa bóng; Lụa lì; Nhẵn; Bóng mềm mại; Sáng mềm mại; Khác
sk-SK: Úroveň lesku/blýskavosti: Dead-matte; Deep-matte; Dull-matte; Škrupinový; Extra matný; Flat-matte; Lesklý; Kladivový; Vysoký lesk; Matný; Kovový lesk; Zrkadlový; Saténový; Saténový lesk; Pololesklý; Polomatný; Polosaténový; Hodvábny; Hodvábne lesklý; Hodvábne matný; Hladký; Mäkký lesk; Mäkký ligotavý; Iné
de: Glanzgrad: Totmatt; Tiefmatt; Stumpfmatt; Eggshell; Extra matt; Flachmatt; Glänzend; Hammer; Hochglanz; Matt; Metallischer Glanz; Spiegel; Seidenmatt; Seidenglanz; Mattglänzend; Halbmatt; Halb satiniert; Seide; Seidenglanz; Seidenmatt; Glatt; Sanfter Glanz; Sanfter Glanz; Sonstiges
fi: Loisto-/kiiltotaso: Täysmatta; Syvä matta; Himmeä matta; Munankuori; Extramatta; Tasainen matta; Kiiltävä; Vasara; Erittäin kiiltävä; Matta; Metallinen kiilto; Peili; Satiini; Satiinikiilto; Puolikiiltävä; Puolimatta; Puolisatiini; Silkki; Silkkikiilto; Silkkimatta; Sileä; Pehmeä kiilto; Pehmeän kuultava; Muu
pl: Poziom połysku/błysku: Dead-matte; Deep-matte; Dull-matte; Skorupa jaja; Extra-matte; Flat-matte; Połysk; Młotek; Wysoki połysk; Matowy; Metaliczny połysk; Lustro; Satyna; Satynowy połysk; Półpołysk; Półmat; Półsatyna; Jedwab; Jedwabny połysk; Jedwabny mat; Gładki; Miękki połysk; Łagodny połysk; Inne
cs: Úroveň lesku: Mrtvě matné; Hluboce matné; Nevýrazně matné; Vaječná skořápka; Extra matné; Krycí matné; Lesk; Kladivo; Vysoký lesk; Matná; Metalický lesk; Zrcadlo; Satén; Saténový lesk; Pololesklý; Polomatný; Polosaténový; Hedvábí; Hedvábně lesklý; Hedvábně matný; Hladký; Jemný lesk; Jemně zářivý; Jiné
hu: Ragyogás/fényesség szintje: Halvány-matt; Mély-matt; Világos-matt; Tojáshéj; Extra-matt; Lapos-matt; Fényes; Kalapács; Magas fényű; Matt; Fémes fényű; Tükör; Szatén; Szatén-fényes; Félig fényes; Fél-matt; Fél-szatén; Selyem; Selyemfényű; Selyem-matt; Sima; Lágy fényű; Lágy fényesség; Egyéb
tr: Işıltı/Parıltı düzeyi: Koyu mat; Derin mat; Soluk mat; Yumurta kabuğu; Ekstra mat; Düz mat; Parlak; Çekiç; Çok parlak; Mat; Metalik parlak; Ayna; Saten; Saten parlak; Yarı parlak; Yarı mat; Yarı saten; İpek; İpeksi parlak; İpeksi mat; Pürüzsüz; Yumuşak parlaklık; Yumuşak ışıltı; Diğer
th: ระดับความแวววาว/ความเงา: สีด้านมาก; สีด้านที่สุด; สีด้านเล็กน้อย; เปลือกไข่; สีด้านพิเศษ; สีด้านเรียบ; วาว; ค้อน; วาวมาก; ด้าน; วาวโลหะ; กระจก; กระดาษเนื้อซาติน; ซาตินมันเงา; กึ่งเงา; กึ่งด้าน; กึ่งซาติน; ผ้าไหม; วาวแบบซิลก์; ซิลก์ด้าน; เรียบ; วาวเล็กน้อย; เงาเล็กน้อย; อื่นๆ
da: Glansniveau: Død-mat; Dyb-mat; Kedelig-mat; Æggeskal; Ekstra-mat; Flad-mat; Glans; Hammer; Højglans; Mat; Metallisk glans; Spejl; Satin; Satin-glans; Semi-glans; Semi-mat; Semi-satin; Silke; Silkeglans; Silkemat; Glat; Blød glans; Blødt skær; Andet
hr-HR: Razina svjetlucavosti/sjaja: Mrtvi mat; Duboki mat; Zagasiti mat; Ljuska jajeta; Ekstra mat; Ravni mat; Sjaj; Čekić; Visoki sjaj; Mat; Metalni sjaj; Ogledalo; Saten; Satenski sjaj; Polusjajno; Polumat; Polusatensko; Svila; Svileni sjaj; Svileni mat; Glatko; Meki sjaj; Meko svjetlucanje; Ostalo
en: Sheen/Gloss level: Dead-matte; Deep-matte; Dull-matte; Eggshell; Extra-matte; Flat-matte; Gloss; Hammer; High-gloss; Matte; Metallic gloss; Mirror; Satin; Satin-gloss; Semi-gloss; Semi-matte; Semi-satin; Silk; Silk-gloss; Silk-matte; Smooth; Soft gloss; Soft sheen; Other
ja: 光沢/艶のレベル: デッドマット; ディープマット; ダルマット; エッグシェル; エクストラマット; フラットマット; グロス; ハンマー; 高光沢; マット; メタリックグロス; ミラー; サテン; サテングロス; セミグロス; セミマット; セミサテン; シルク; シルクグロス; シルクマット; スムース; ソフトグロス; ソフトな光沢; その他
pt-PT: Nível de lustro/brilho: Mate baço; Mate profundo; Mate opaco; Casca de ovo; Extra mate; Mate liso; Brilhante; Martelo; Brilhante; Mate; Brilho metálico; Espelho; Acetinado; Brilho acetinado; Semibrilhante; Semimate; Semiacetinado; Seda; Brilho de seda; Seda mate; Macio; Brilho suave; Lustro suave; Outro
sl-SI: Stopnja leska/sijaja: Povsem mat; Temno mat; Pusto mat; Jajčna lupina; Zelo mat; Čisto mat; Sijaj; Pegasta; Visok sijaj; Mat; Kovinski sijaj; Zrcalno; Satenast; Satenast sijaj; Polsijajni; Polmat; Polsatenski; Svilnat; Svilnat sijaj; Svilnat mat; Gladka; Mehki sijaj; Mehak lesk; Drugo
it: Livello di lucentezza/brillantezza: Poco opaco; Molto opaco; Opaco profondo; Guscio d’uovo; Extra opaco; Opaco piatto; Lucido; Martello; Molto lucido; Matte; Lucido metallizzato; Specchio; Satinato; Satinato-lucido; Semilucido; Semiopaco; Semi-satinato; Seta; Seta lucida; Seta opaca; Liscio; Lucida morbida; Lucentezza morbida; Altro
ro-RO: Nivel de strălucire/luciu: Ultra-mat; Mat intens; Mat estompat; Coajă de ou; Extra-mat; Mat uniform; Lucios; Lovitură de ciocan; Foarte lucios; Mat; Luciu metalic; Oglindă; Satin; Luciu satinat; Semi-lucios; Semi-mat; Semi-satinat; Mătase; Lucios mătăsos; Mat mătăsos; Omogen; Strălucire delicată; Luciu delicat; Altele
ko: 광택/광택 수준: 데드 매트; 딥 매트; 둘 매트; 달걀 껍질; 엑스트라 매트; 플랫 매트; 글로스; 해머; 고광택; 매트; 메탈릭 글로스; 거울; 새틴; 새틴 글로스; 세미 글로스; 세미 매트; 세미 세틴; 실크; 실크 글로스; 실크 매트; 매끄러운; 소프트 글로스; 부드러운 광택; 기타
zh-CN: 光亮度/光泽度: 死哑光; 深哑光; 暗哑光; 蛋壳漆; 超哑光; 平哑光; 亮光; 锤纹; 高光泽; 哑光; 金属光泽; 镜子; 缎; 缎光; 半光面; 半哑光; 半缎; 丝绸; 丝绸光泽; 丝绸哑光; 光滑; 柔和光泽; 软光泽; 其他
ru: Уровень блеска/глянца: Матовый; Глубокий матовый; Тускло-матовый; Яичная скорлупа; Экстра-матовый; Плоский матовый; Глянцевый; Хаммер; Высокий глянец; Матовый; Металлический блеск; Зеркальный; Сатиновый; Сатиново-глянцевый; Полуглянцевый; Полуматовый; Полусатиновый; Шелковый; Шелково-глянцевый; Шелково-матовый; Гладкий; Мягкий блеск; Мягкое сияние; Другой
nl: Glansniveau: Ultramat; Diepmat; Stompmat; Eischaal; Extra mat; Vlakmat; Glans; Hamer; Hoogglans; Mat; Metallic glans; Spiegel; Satijn; Satijnglans; Halfglanzend; Halfmat; Halfsatijn; Zijde; Zijdeglans; Zijdemat; Glad; Zachte glans; Zacht glanzend; Andere
zh-TW: 光澤度/亮光度: 完全霧面; 深層霧面; 消光霧面; 蛋殼; 極致霧面; 平光霧面; 亮彩唇蜜; 錘紋; 高光澤; 霧面; 金屬光澤; 鏡面; 緞面布; 緞光; 半光澤; 半霧面; 半緞面; 絲綢; 絲綢光澤; 絲綢霧面; 光滑; 柔光; 柔和的光澤; 其他
es: Nivel de brillo/lustre: Mate apagado; Mate profundo; Mate opaco; Cáscara de huevo; Extramate; Mate liso; Brillo; Martillo; Alto brillo; Mate; Brillo metálico; Espejo; Satinado; Brillo satinado; Semibrillante; Semimate; Semisatinado; Seda; Seda brillo; Seda mate; Suave; Brillo suave; Brillo suave; Otros
lt-LT: Žvilgesio / blizgumo lygis: Lygus matinis; Itin matinis; Prigesintas matinis; Kiaušinio lukštas; Ekstramatinis; Padidinto matiškumo; Blizgus; Blizgus kaldintas; Itin blizgus; Matinis; Metalinis blizgesys; Veidrodinis; Satinas; Satino žvilgesys; Pusiau blizgus; Pusiau matinis; Pusiau satininis; Šilkas; Šilko žvilgesys; Šilkinis matinis; Tolygus; Švelniai žvilgantis; Švelnus blizgantis; Kita
pt-BR: Nível de brilho/lustre: Fosco total; Fosco profundo; Fosco opaco; Casca de ovo; Extrafosco; Liso/fosco; Gloss; Martelo; Alto brilho; Fosco; Brilho metálico; Espelho; Cetim; Acetinado brilho; Semi-brilho; Semifosco; Semiacetinado; Seda; Seda brilho; Seda fosco; Suave; Brilho suave; Brilho suave; Outro
sv: Glansnivå: Helmatt; Djupmatt; Matt-matt; Äggskal; Extra matt; Platt-matt; Glans; Hammare; Högglans; Matt; Metallisk glans; Spegel; Satin; Satinblank; Halvblank; Semimatt; Semisatin; Silke; Sidenblank; Sidenmatt; Slät; Mjuk glans; Mjukt sken; Övrigt
fr: Niveau de brillance: Mat absolu; Mat profond; Mat terne; Coquille d’œuf; Extra mat; Mat uniforme; Brillant; Marteau; Haute brillance; Mat; Éclat métallique; Miroir; Satiné; Éclat satiné; Semi-brillant; Semi-mat; Semi-satiné; Soie; Soie éclatante; Soie matte; Lisse; Éclat lisse; Lustre lisse; Autre